California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(c) Upon a writ being issued solely on a showing under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), if the defendant requests the court to review the issuance of the writ, the court shall conduct a hearing within five court days after the plaintiff is served with notice of the defendant’s request. A writ issued solely on a showing under paragraph
(3) of subdivision (b) shall be limited to the property covered by the bulk sales notice or the proceeds of the sale of such property. In addition to any other service required by this title, such writ shall be served by the levying officer on the transferee or auctioneer identified by the bulk sales notice not more than five days after the levy of such writ. A writ issued solely on a showing under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) shall be limited to the plaintiff’s pro rata share of the proceeds of the sale in escrow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Order Determining Right to Attach; Issuance of Writ of Attachment [485.210. - 485.240.]

485.210.

(a) Upon the filing of the complaint or at any time thereafter, the plaintiff may apply pursuant to this article for a right to attach order and a writ of attachment by filing an application for the order and writ with the court in which the action is brought.

(b) The application shall satisfy the requirements of Section 484.020 and, in addition, shall include a statement showing that the requirement of Section 485.010 is satisfied.

(c) The application shall be supported by an affidavit showing all of the following:

(1) The plaintiff on the facts presented would be entitled to a judgment on the claim upon which the attachment is based.

(2) The plaintiff would suffer great or irreparable injury (within the meaning of Section 485.010) if issuance of the order were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

(3) The property sought to be attached is not exempt from attachment.

(d) An affidavit in support of the showing required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) may be based on the affiant’s information and belief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

485.220.

(a) The court shall examine the application and supporting affidavit and, except as provided in Section 486.030, shall issue a right to attach order, which shall state the amount to be secured by the attachment, and order a writ of attachment to be issued upon the filing of an undertaking as provided by Sections 489.210 and 489.220, if it finds all of the following:

(1) The claim upon which the attachment is based is one upon which an attachment may be issued.

(2) The plaintiff has established the probable validity of the claim upon which the attachment is based.

(3) The attachment is not sought for a purpose other than the recovery upon the claim upon which the attachment is based.

(4) The affidavit accompanying the application shows that the property sought to be attached, or the portion thereof to be specified in the writ, is not exempt from attachment.

(5) The plaintiff will suffer great or irreparable injury (within the meaning of Section 485.010) if issuance of the order is delayed until the matter can be heard on notice.

(6) The amount to be secured by the attachment is greater than zero.

(b) If the court finds that the application and the supporting affidavit do not satisfy the requirements of Section 485.010, it shall so state and deny the order. If denial is solely on the ground that Section 485.010 is not satisfied, the court shall so state and such denial does not preclude the plaintiff from applying for a right to attach order and writ of attachment under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 484.010) with the same affidavits and supporting papers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 222, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

485.230.

Where a right to attach order has been issued by the court, a plaintiff may discover, through any means provided for by, and subject to the protections included in, Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4, the identity, location, and value of property in which the defendant has an interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

485.240.

(a) Any defendant whose property has been attached pursuant to a writ issued under this chapter may apply for an order (1) that the right to attach order be set aside, the writ of attachment quashed, and any property levied upon pursuant to the writ be released, or (2) that the amount to be secured by the attachment be reduced as provided in Section 483.015. Such application shall be made by filing with the court and serving on the plaintiff a notice of motion. 

(b) The notice of motion shall state the grounds on which the motion is
based and shall be accompanied by an affidavit supporting any factual issues raised and points and authorities supporting any legal issues raised. It shall not be grounds to set aside an order that the plaintiff would not have suffered great or irreparable injury (within the meaning of Section 485.010) if issuance of the order had been delayed until the matter could have been heard on notice.

(c) At the hearing on the motion, the court shall determine whether the plaintiff is entitled to the right to attach order or whether the amount to be secured by the attachment should be reduced. If the court finds that the plaintiff is not entitled to the right to attach order, it shall order the right to attach order set aside, the writ of attachment quashed, and any property levied on pursuant to the writ released. If the court finds that the plaintiff is entitled to the right to attach order, thereafter the plaintiff may apply for additional writs
pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 484.310) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 484.510) of Chapter 4.

(d) The court’s determinations shall be made upon the basis of the pleadings and other papers in the record; but, upon good cause shown, the court may receive and consider at the hearing additional evidence, oral or documentary, and additional points and authorities, or it may continue the hearing for the production of such additional evidence or points and authorities.

(e) The hearing provided for in this section shall take precedence over all other civil matters on the calendar of that day except older matters of the same character.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedure for Obtaining Additional Writs [485.510. - 485.540.]

485.510.

At any time after a right to attach order and writ of attachment have been issued under Article 2 (commencing with Section 485.210), the plaintiff may apply for an additional writ of attachment under this article by filing an application with the court in which the action is brought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

485.520.

The application shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(a) A statement that the plaintiff has been issued a right to attach order and writ of attachment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 485.210) in the action.

(b) A statement of the amount to be secured by the attachment under the right to attach order.

(c) A description of the property to be attached under the writ of attachment and a statement that the plaintiff
is informed and believes that the property is not exempt from attachment. The description shall satisfy the requirements of Section 484.020.

(d) A statement showing that the requirement of Section 485.010 has been satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 41.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

485.530.

(a) The application shall be supported by an affidavit showing both of the following:

(1) The plaintiff would suffer great or irreparable injury (within the meaning of Section 485.010) if the issuance of the writ of attachment were delayed until the matter could be heard on notice.

(2) The property sought to be attached is not exempt from attachment.

(b) The affidavit in support of the showing required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be based on
the affiant’s information and belief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------

485.540.

The court shall examine the application and supporting affidavit and shall order a writ of attachment to be issued upon the filing of an undertaking as provided by Sections 489.210 and 489.220, if it finds all of the following:

(a) A right to attach order has been issued in the action pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 485.210).

(b) The affidavit accompanying the application shows that the property sought to be attached, or the portion thereof to be specified in the writ, is not exempt from attachment.

(c) The plaintiff will suffer great or irreparable injury (within the meaning of Section 485.010) if issuance of the writ of attachment is delayed until the matter can be heard on notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Claim of Exemption [485.610. - 485.610.]

485.610.

(a) The defendant may claim an exemption as to real or personal property levied upon pursuant to a writ of attachment issued under this chapter by following the procedure set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9, except that the defendant shall claim the exemption as to personal property not later than 30 days after the levying officer serves the defendant with the notice of attachment describing such property and may claim an exemption for real property within the time provided in Section 487.030. For this purpose, references in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510)
of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 to the “judgment debtor” shall be deemed references to the defendant, and references to the “judgment creditor” shall be deemed references to the plaintiff.

(b) The defendant may claim the exemption provided by subdivision (b) of Section 487.020 within the time provided by subdivision (a) of this section either (1) by following the procedure set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703. 510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 or (2) by following the procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 482.100 except that the requirement of showing changed circumstances under subdivision (a) of Section 482.100 does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Temporary Protective Order [486.010. - 486.110.]

486.010.

(a) At the time of applying for a right to attach order under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 484.010), the plaintiff may apply pursuant to this chapter for a temporary protective order by filing an application for the order with the court in which the action is brought.

(b) The application shall state what relief is requested and shall be supported by an affidavit, which may be based on information and belief, showing that the plaintiff would suffer great or irreparable injury (within the meaning of Section 485.010) if the temporary protective order were not
 issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

486.020.

The court shall examine the application, supporting affidavit, and other papers on record and shall issue a temporary protective order, which shall state the amount sought to be secured by the attachment under the application for the right to attach order, upon the filing of an undertaking as provided by Sections 489.210 and 489.220, if it finds all of the following:

(a) The claim upon which the application for attachment is based is one upon which an attachment may be issued.

(b) The plaintiff has established the
 probable validity of the claim upon which the application for the attachment is based.

(c) The order is not sought for a purpose other than the recovery upon the claim upon which the application for the attachment is based.

(d) The plaintiff will suffer great or irreparable injury (within the meaning of Section 485.010) if the temporary protective order is not issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 42.5.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

486.030.

(a) In any case where the plaintiff has applied for a right to attach order and writ of attachment under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010), the court may in its discretion deny the application for the order and writ and issue instead a temporary protective order under this chapter if it determines that the requirements of Section 485.220 are satisfied but that the issuance of the temporary protective order instead of the right to attach order and writ would be in the interest of justice and equity to the parties, taking into account the effect on the defendant of issuing a writ of attachment ex parte, the effect on the plaintiff of issuing
 the temporary protective order instead of the writ, and other factors that bear on equity and justice under the circumstances of the particular case.

(b) If the court issues a temporary protective order under this section, the plaintiff’s application for a right to attach order and writ shall be treated as an application for a right to attach order and writ under Article 1 (commencing with Section 484.010) of Chapter 4 and the plaintiff shall comply with the requirements of service provided in Section 484.040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

486.040.

The temporary protective order issued under this chapter shall contain such provisions as the court determines would be in the interest of justice and equity to the parties, taking into account the effects on both the defendant and the plaintiff under the circumstances of the particular case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

486.050.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 486.040, the temporary protective order may prohibit a transfer by the defendant of any of the defendant’s property in this state subject to the levy of the writ of attachment. The temporary protective order shall describe the property in a manner adequate to permit the defendant to identify the property subject to the temporary protective order.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the property is farm products held for sale
 or is inventory, the temporary protective order shall not prohibit the defendant from transferring the property in the ordinary course of business, but the temporary protective order may impose appropriate restrictions on the disposition of the proceeds from that type of transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

486.060.

(a) Notwithstanding any terms of the temporary protective order, the defendant may issue any number of checks against any of the defendant’s accounts in a financial institution in this state to the extent permitted by this section.

(b) The defendant may issue any number of checks in any amount for the following purposes:

(1) Payment of any payroll expense (including fringe benefits and taxes and premiums for workers’ compensation and unemployment insurance) falling due in the ordinary course of
 business prior to the levy of a writ of attachment.

(2) Payment for goods thereafter delivered to the defendant C.O.D. for use in the defendant’s trade, business, or profession.

(3) Payment of taxes if payment is necessary to avoid penalties which will accrue if there is any further delay in payment.

(4) Payment of reasonable legal fees and reasonable costs and expenses required for the representation of the defendant in the action.

(c) In addition to the checks permitted to be issued by subdivision (b), the defendant may issue any number of checks for any purpose so long as the total amount of the checks does not exceed the greater of the following:

(1) The amount by which the total
 amount on deposit exceeds the sum of the amount sought to be secured by the attachment and the amounts permitted to be paid pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) One thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 43.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

486.070.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 486.110, a temporary protective order issued under this chapter binds only the defendant, whether or not any other person knows of or is served with a copy of the temporary protective order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------

486.080.

The temporary protective order shall be personally served on the defendant together with the documents referred to in Section 484.040.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 44.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

486.090.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, the temporary protective order shall expire at the earliest of the following times:

(a) Forty days after the issuance of the order or, if an earlier date is prescribed by the court in the order, on such earlier date.

(b) As to specific property described in the order, when a levy of attachment upon that property is made by the plaintiff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------

486.100.

Upon ex parte application of the defendant or, if the court so orders, after a noticed hearing, the court may modify or vacate the temporary protective order if it determines that such action would be in the interest of justice and equity to the parties, taking into account the effect on the defendant of the continuance of the original order, the effect on the plaintiff of modifying or vacating the order, and any other factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

486.110.

(a) The service upon the defendant of a temporary protective order pursuant to Section 486.080 creates a lien upon any property, or the proceeds thereof, which is described in the order, is owned by the defendant at the time of such service, and is subject to attachment pursuant to this title. The lien continues on property subject to the lien, notwithstanding the transfer or encumbrance of the property subject to the lien, unless the person receiving the property, whether real or personal, is a person listed in Section 697.740.

(b) The lien terminates upon the
 date of expiration of the temporary protective order except with respect to property levied upon while the temporary protective order is in effect under a writ of attachment issued upon application of the plaintiff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Property Subject to Attachment [487.010. - 487.030.]

487.010.

The following property of the defendant is subject to attachment:

(a) Where the defendant is a corporation, all corporate property for which a method of levy is provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 488.300) of Chapter 8.

(b) Where the defendant is a partnership or other unincorporated association, all partnership or association property for which a method of levy is provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 488.300) of Chapter 8.

(c) Where the
 defendant is a natural person, all of the following property:

(1) Interests in real property except leasehold estates with unexpired terms of less than one year.

(2) Accounts receivable, chattel paper, and general intangibles arising out of the conduct by the defendant of a trade, business, or profession, except any such individual claim with a principal balance of less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(3) Equipment.

(4) Farm products.

(5) Inventory.

(6) Final money judgments arising out of the conduct by the defendant of a trade, business, or profession.

(7) Money on the premises where a trade, business, or profession is conducted by the defendant and, except for the first one thousand dollars ($1,000), money located elsewhere than on such premises and deposit accounts, but, if the defendant has more than one deposit account or has at least one deposit account and money located elsewhere than on the premises where a trade, business, or profession is conducted by the defendant, the court, upon application of the plaintiff, may order that the writ of attachment be levied so that an aggregate amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the form of such money and in such accounts remains free of levy.

(8) Negotiable documents of title.

(9) Instruments.

(10) Securities.

(11) Minerals or the like
 (including oil and gas) to be extracted.

(d) In the case of a defendant described in subdivision (c), community property of a type described in subdivision (c) is subject to attachment if the community property would be subject to enforcement of the judgment obtained in the action in which the attachment is sought. Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, if community property that is subject to attachment is sought to be attached:

(1) Any provision of this title that applies to the property of the defendant or to obligations owed to the defendant also applies to the community property interest of the spouse of the defendant and to obligations owed to either spouse that are community property.

(2) Any provision of this title that applies to property in the possession or under the control of the defendant
 also applies to community property in the possession or under the control of the spouse of the defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 46.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

487.020.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3439.07 of the Civil Code, the following property is exempt from attachment:

(a) All property exempt from enforcement of a money judgment.

(b) Property which is necessary for the support of a defendant who is a natural person or the family of such defendant supported in whole or in part by the defendant.

(c) “Earnings” as defined by Section 706.011.

(d) All property not subject to attachment pursuant to Section 487.010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 383, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

487.025.

(a) The recording of a homestead declaration (as defined in Section 704.910) does not limit or affect the right of a plaintiff to attach the declared homestead described in the homestead declaration, whether the homestead declaration is recorded before or after the declared homestead is attached.

(b) An attachment lien attaches to a homestead (as defined in Section 704.710) in the amount of any surplus over the total of the following:

(1) All liens and encumbrances on the homestead at the time the
 attachment lien is created.

(2) The homestead exemption set forth in Section 704.730.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) or (b) limits the right of the defendant to an exemption under subdivision (b) of Section 487.020.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a homestead (as defined in Section 704.710) is exempt from sale to the extent provided in Section 704.800 when it is sought to be sold to enforce the judgment obtained in the action in which the attachment was obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 47.5.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

487.030.

(a) At any time prior to the entry of judgment in the action, the defendant may claim any exemption provided by subdivision (a) of Section 487.020 with respect to real property by following the procedure set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9. A claim of exemption under this subdivision shall be denied if the claim has been denied earlier in the action.

(b) At any time prior to the entry of judgment in the action, the defendant may claim the exemption provided by subdivision (b) of Section 487.020 with respect
 to real property either (1) by following the procedure set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 or (2) by following the procedure set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 482.100 except that the requirement of showing changed circumstances under subdivision (a) of Section 482.100 does not apply. A claim of exemption under this subdivision shall be denied if the claim has been denied earlier in the action and there is no change in circumstances affecting the claim.

(c) For the purposes of this section, references in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 to the “judgment debtor” shall be deemed references to the defendant, and references to the “judgment creditor” shall be deemed references to the plaintiff.

(d) Nothing in this section limits the right to claim after the entry of
 judgment a homestead exemption for real property under Article 4 (commencing with Section 704.710) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 9 unless prior to entry of judgment the defendant has claimed the exemption provided by subdivision (a) of Section 487.020 with respect to such property and the claim has been denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 48.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Levy Procedures; Lien of Attachment; Management and Disposition of Attached Property [488.010. - 488.740.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [488.010. - 488.140.]

488.010.

The writ of attachment shall include the following information:

(a) The date of issuance of the writ.

(b) The title of the court that issued the writ and the cause and number of the action.

(c) The name and address of the plaintiff and the name and last known address of the defendant.

(d) The amount to be secured by the attachment.

(e) A description of the property to be levied upon to satisfy the attachment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.020.

(a) A writ of attachment shall be directed to a levying officer in the county in which property of the defendant described in the writ may be located and to any registered process server.

(b) Upon the receipt of written instructions from the plaintiff’s attorney of record or, if the plaintiff has no attorney of record, from the plaintiff, the levying officer to whom the writ is directed and delivered shall levy the writ without delay in the manner provided in this chapter on the property described in the writ or so much thereof as is clearly sufficient to satisfy
the amount to be secured by the attachment. The levying officer is not liable for a determination made in good faith under this subdivision.

(c) If a copy of the summons and complaint has not previously been served on the defendant, the instructions to the levying officer shall instruct the levying officer to make the service at the same time the levying officer serves the defendant with a copy of the writ of attachment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.030.

(a) The plaintiff shall give the levying officer instructions in writing. The instructions shall be signed by the plaintiff’s attorney of record or, if the plaintiff does not have an attorney of record, by the plaintiff. The instructions shall contain the information needed or requested by the levying officer to comply with the provisions of this title, including but not limited to: 

(1) An adequate description of any property to be levied upon.

(2) A statement whether the property is a dwelling.

(3) If the property is a dwelling, whether it is real or personal property.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), the levying officer shall act in accordance with the written instructions to the extent the actions are taken in conformance with the provisions of this title.

(c) Except to the extent the levying officer has actual knowledge that the information is incorrect, the levying officer may rely on any information contained in the written instructions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.040.

(a) If the levying officer is required by any provision of this title to serve any writ, order, notice, or other paper on any person, the plaintiff shall include in the instructions to the levying officer the correct name and address of the person. The plaintiff shall use reasonable diligence to ascertain the correct name and address of the person.

(b) Unless the levying officer has actual knowledge that the name or address included in the instructions is incorrect, the levying officer shall rely on the instructions in serving the writ, order, notice, or other
paper on the person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.050.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law:

(1) As a prerequisite to the performance by the levying officer of a duty under this title, the plaintiff shall deposit a sum of money with the levying officer sufficient to pay the costs of performing the duty.

(2) As a prerequisite to the taking of property into custody by the levying officer under this chapter, whether by keeper or otherwise, the plaintiff shall deposit with the levying officer a sum of money sufficient to pay the costs of taking the
property and keeping it safely for a period not to exceed 15 days. If continuation of the custody of the property is required, the levying officer shall, from time to time, demand orally or in writing that the plaintiff deposit additional amounts to cover estimated costs for periods not to exceed 30 days each. A written demand may be mailed or delivered to the plaintiff. The plaintiff has not less than three business days after receipt of the demand within which to comply with the demand. If the amount demanded is not paid within the time specified in the oral or written demand, the levying officer shall release the property.

(b) The levying officer is not liable for failure to take or hold property unless the plaintiff has complied with the provisions of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.060.

The notice of attachment shall inform the person notified of all of the following:

(a) The capacity in which the person is notified.

(b) The specific property which is sought to be attached.

(c) The person’s rights under the attachment, including the right to make a third-party claim pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010) of Title 9.

(d) The person’s duties under the attachment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.065.

A copy of the original notice of attachment which has been served upon a third party holding the property sought to be attached, if served upon the defendant or any other party, shall suffice as the notice of attachment to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

488.070.

If a writ of attachment has been issued and personal property sought to be attached under the writ is located in a private place of the defendant:

(a) The levying officer shall comply with the provisions of Section 699.030. 

(b) The plaintiff may obtain the relief provided under Section 699.030 in the manner and subject to the requirements of that section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.080.

(a) A registered process server may levy under a writ of attachment on the following types of property:

(1) Real property, pursuant to Section 488.315.

(2) Growing crops, timber to be cut, or minerals or the like, including oil and gas, to be extracted or accounts
receivable resulting from the sale thereof at the wellhead or minehead, pursuant to Section 488.325.

(3) Personal property in the custody of a levying officer, pursuant to Section 488.355.

(4) Equipment of a going business, pursuant to Section 488.375.

(5) Motor vehicles, vessels, mobilehomes, or commercial coaches used as equipment of a going business, pursuant to Section 488.385.

(6) Farm products or inventory of a going business, pursuant to Section 488.405.

(7) Personal property used as a dwelling, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 700.080.

(8) Deposit accounts, pursuant to Section 488.455.

(9) Property in a safe-deposit box, pursuant to Section 488.460.

(10) Accounts receivable or general intangibles, pursuant to Section 488.470.

(11) Final money judgments, pursuant to Section 488.480.

(12) Interest of a defendant in personal property in the estate of a decedent, pursuant to Section 488.485.

(b) Before levying under the writ of attachment, the registered process server shall cause to be deposited with the levying officer a copy of the writ and the fee, as provided by Section 26721 of the Government Code.

(c) If a registered process server levies on property pursuant to subdivision (a), the registered process
server shall do both of the following:

(1) Comply with the applicable levy, posting, and service provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 488.300).

(2) Request any third person served to give a garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer in compliance with Section 488.610 on a form provided by the registered process server.

(d) Within five court days after levy under this section, all of the following shall be filed with the levying officer:

(1) The writ of attachment.

(2) A proof of service by the registered process server stating the manner of levy performed.

(3) Proof of service of the copy of the writ and notice
of attachment on other persons, as required by Article 2 (commencing with Section 488.300).

(4) Instructions in writing, as required by the provisions of Section 488.030.

(e) If the fee provided by Section 26721 of the Government Code has been paid, the levying officer shall perform all other duties under the writ as if the levying officer had levied under the writ and shall return the writ to the court. If the registered process server does not comply with subdivisions (b) and (d), the levy is ineffective and the levying officer shall not be required to perform any duties under the writ, and may issue a release for any property sought to be attached. The levying officer is not liable for actions taken in conformance with the provisions of this title in reliance on information provided to the levying officer under subdivision (d), except to the extent that the levying officer has
actual knowledge that the information is incorrect. Nothing in this subdivision limits any liability the plaintiff or registered process server may have if the levying officer acts on the basis of incorrect information provided under subdivision (d).

(f) The fee for services of a registered process server under this section is a recoverable cost pursuant to Section 1033.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 102, Sec. 1.   (AB 2211)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

488.090.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, where the method of levy upon property requires that property be taken into custody or where the levying officer is otherwise directed to take property into custody, the levying officer may do so by any of the following methods:

(a) Removing the property to a place of safekeeping.

(b) Installing a keeper.

(c) Otherwise obtaining possession or control of the property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.100.

The levying officer has a special lien, dependent upon possession, on personal property levied upon in the amount of the levying officer’s costs for which an advance has not been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.110.

A third person shall claim an interest in property attached in the manner provided for third-party claims under Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010) of Title 9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.120.

In any case where property has been levied upon and, pursuant to a levy, a copy of the writ of attachment and a notice of attachment are required by statute to be posted or to be served on or mailed to the defendant or other person, failure to post, serve, or mail the copy of the writ and the notice does not affect the attachment lien created by the levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.130.

(a) The levying officer to whom the writ of attachment is delivered shall return the writ to the court from which the writ issued, together with a report of the levying officer’s actions. The return shall be made promptly in accordance with the plaintiff’s instructions given to the levying officer but in no event later than 60 days after the levying officer receives the writ.

(b) The levying officer shall make a full inventory of property attached and return the inventory with the writ.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1198, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 70 of Ch. 1198.)
-------------------------------------------

488.140.

(a) The levying officer or registered process server is not liable for actions taken in conformance with the provisions of this title, including actions taken in conformance with the provisions of this title in reliance on information contained in the written instructions of the plaintiff except to the extent the levying officer or registered process server has actual knowledge that the information is incorrect. Nothing in this subdivision limits any liability the plaintiff may have if the levying officer or registered process server acts on the basis of incorrect information given in the written
instructions.

(b) Unless the levying officer is negligent in the care or handling of the property, the levying officer is not liable to either the plaintiff or the defendant for loss by fire, theft, injury, or damage of any kind to personal property while (1) in the possession of the levying officer either in a warehouse or other storage place or in the custody of a keeper or (2) in transit to or from a warehouse or other storage place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 5.5.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)